Wyoming statutes. Title 36 State Lands
Chapter 4 State Parks and Cultural Resources
§ 36-4-117.
Jurisdiction over grazing districts.

Nothing in this act, shall be construed as giving jurisdiction to the department of state parks and cultural resources over interest in any grazing district established under the terms of the Taylor Grazing Act unless and until agreement and consent of the board of directors of the grazing district to this effect is formally secured.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 187, § 17; W.S. 1957, § 36.44-17; Laws 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1999, ch. 69, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 36-4-101(j).

Taylor Grazing Act. —

The federal Taylor Grazing Act, referred to in this section, appears as 43 U.S.C. § 315 et seq.

§ 36-4-118.
Compensation prohibited; per diem and travel expenses permitted.

The members of the commission and the advisory board shall not receive any compensation for their services, but when actually engaged in the performance of their duties, they shall be paid a per diem for each day of such actual service and be reimbursed for their travel expenses at the same rate applicable to travel expenses of other state officers.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 187, § 18; W.S. 1957, § 36-44.18.

Cross references. —

As to per diem allowance and transportation expenses for state officers, see §

9-3-102

.

§ 36-4-119.
Existing agreements binding; successor to records and duties; taxation exemption.

Effective April 1, 1990 the department of commerce shall be bound by any and all agreements, contracts and obligations incurred by the Wyoming recreation commission to which it had been bound because they were incurred by the Wyoming state parks commission and land and water conservation commission and Old South Pass historical preserve commission prior to July 1, 1973, and shall succeed to all records, documents, equipment, and other personal or real property under the control and management of the parks commission of Wyoming and the state land and water conservation commission of Wyoming and the Old South Pass historical preserve commission of Wyoming acquired and used in the performance of duties previously imposed upon those commissioners. All money from operation of the Old South Pass historical preserve shall be credited to the general fund. Effective July 1, 1999 the department of state parks and cultural resources shall be bound by any and all agreements, contracts and obligations incurred by the department of commerce to which it had been bound because they were incurred by the Wyoming state parks commission and land and water conservation commission and Old South Pass historical preserve commission prior to July 1, 1973, and shall succeed to all records, documents, equipment, and other personal or real property under the control and management of the parks commission of Wyoming and the state land and water conservation commission of Wyoming and the Old South Pass historical preserve commission of Wyoming acquired and used in the performance of duties previously imposed upon those commissioners. All money from operation of the Old South Pass historical preserve shall be credited in accordance with W.S. 36-4-121(h).

The department of state parks and cultural resources, in consultation with the commission, is hereby charged with the duties and responsibilities heretofore devolved upon the Old South Pass historical preserve, and for the purpose of discharging same is hereby invested with all the powers and authority heretofore vested in such Old South Pass historical preserve, subject to the same limitations thereof; and the department of state parks and cultural resources, in consultation with the commission, is authorized to delegate the same, or so much thereof as it shall provide, to an administrator or to a committee appointed by it for the performance of its functions hereunder.

User fees and other charges for the South Pass preserve development are exempt from taxation by the state.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 187, § 19; W.S. 1957, § 36.44-19; Laws 1969, ch. 205, § 2; 1973, ch. 245, §§ 3, 5; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1999, ch. 69, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to powers of Old South Pass historical preserve, see §§

36-8-501

and

36-8-502

.

Quoted

in

Hagar v. Mobley, 638 P.2d 127,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 404

(Wyo. 1981).

§ 36-4-120.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 44, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1967, ch. 187, § 20, related to transfer of employees from abolished commissions.

§ 36-4-121.
Permits to use state parks, recreation areas and historic sites.

The department of state parks and cultural resources shall offer for sale permits that allow use of state parks, recreation areas, archeological sites and historic sites as designated by the department with the approval of the Wyoming parks and cultural resources commission. Permits may be subject to per person, per vehicle or time restrictions or any other restriction the director of the department deems appropriate. The director may waive any permit fee imposed pursuant to this section, offer discounts or offer at no charge complimentary permits or gift certificates for permits authorized by this section. Except as provided in subsection (n) of this section, the cost of the permits authorized under this section shall be approved by the commission and set in an amount not to exceed the following:

through (xv) Repealed by Laws 2017, ch. 12, § 2.

Waived for the following:

Persons needing to pass through a state park or historic site to access private property shall be exempt from the entrance permit requirements of this section;

Persons needing access to a state park or historic site to conduct official business or only to access a private commercial business without further use of the state park or historic site shall be exempt from the entrance permit requirements of this section;

School groups on school sanctioned events including events sanctioned by educational programs defined under W.S. 21-4-101(a)(iii), (iv) and (v), and residents and staff of publicly owned homes or institutions while on official agency functions shall be exempt from the entrance permit requirements of this section;

Not for profit groups or organizations needing access to a state park or historic site to provide volunteer assistance or services that have been previously agreed upon by the department of state parks and cultural resources shall be exempt from the permit requirements of this section.

Resident annual daily use permit . . . . . $64.00

Nonresident annual daily use permit . . . . . $96.00

Resident daily use fee . . . . . $8.00

Nonresident daily use fee . . . . . $12.00

Resident overnight camping permit . . . . . $12.00

Nonresident overnight camping permit . . . . . $18.00

Annual resident overnight camping permit . . . . . $96.00

Per person daily use bus fee for guided tours, which shall not be charged to persons under the age of eighteen (18) years . . . . . $5.00

Daily use lodge permit . . . . . $300.00

Daily use group picnic shelter and adjacent ground permit . . . . . $150.00

The department or any selling agent of the department may issue additional vehicle annual daily use permits or additional vehicle annual overnight camping permits upon payment of a fee in an amount not to exceed fifty percent (50%) of the cost of the original annual permit.

The department or any selling agent of the department may issue duplicate annual daily use permits or annual resident overnight camping permits upon the holder of the permit filing an affidavit showing the loss, mutilation or destruction of the original permit and upon payment of a fee in an amount not to exceed twenty-five percent (25%) of the cost of the original annual permit.

Repealed by Laws 1992, ch. 50, § 3.

The department through the division of state parks and historic sites shall in accordance with W.S.

36-4-123

, appoint selling agents to sell annual daily use and annual camping permits authorized under this section. Each appointed selling agent shall retain ten percent (10%) of the cost of each permit sold under this section as his sales commission. Designated department employees may sell permits required by this section but no employee of the department shall receive any commission on permits sold.

and (g) Repealed by Laws 1992, ch. 50, § 3.

The funds received by the department from the sale of the permits shall be deposited into an account within the special revenue fund, hereby created as the state parks account, and, except as otherwise provided by this subsection, may be expended by the department for capital construction projects, major maintenance, and site interpretation such as exhibits, signage and displays as approved by the legislature. Interest on funds in the account shall accrue to the account. Not more than thirty percent (30%) of the funds in the account in any fiscal year may also be expended, with legislative approval, for maintenance of outdoor recreation areas and facilities provided that no amount shall be expended for additional full-time employees or increases in salaries or overtime pay for full-time employees. For fiscal years 2022 and 2023 only, not more than sixty percent (60%) of the funds in the account may be expended, with legislative approval, for maintenance and operational costs associated with outdoor recreation areas and facilities provided that no amount shall be expended for additional full-time employees or increases in salaries or overtime pay for full-time employees.

Any person using state parks, recreation areas, archeological sites and historic sites and failing to obtain a permit authorized by this section and any person otherwise violating this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both.

The department of state parks and cultural resources is authorized to contract with the town of Ranchester to implement a fee collection program at Connor Battlefield state historic site and to provide for park maintenance and operation. Notwithstanding subsection (h) of this section, fees collected for overnight camping at Connor Battlefield state historic site shall be deposited into a separate account and may be expended by the department pursuant to contracts entered into under this subsection.

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 168, § 207.

Any resident disabled veteran who receives fifty percent (50%) or more service connected disability compensation from the United States department of veteran’s affairs may apply to the department for a lifetime permit authorizing the use of state parks, recreation areas, archeological sites and historic sites without payment of any daily use, overnight or other fee authorized to be charged pursuant to this section. Only one (1) permit shall be issued to any qualified applicant under this subsection and shall be valid for the applicant and for all occupants of the applicant’s vehicle. In addition to information and other application procedural requirements prescribed by rule and regulation of the department, application for the lifetime permit shall include proof of residency and certification of the service connected disability. The lifetime permit is valid as long as the holder is a Wyoming resident. A permit under this subsection shall be issued to an eligible applicant without the imposition of a fee.

The department is authorized to sponsor special events and to contract with groups sponsoring special events at state parks, recreation areas, archeological sites or historic sites. A special event fee may be charged regardless of whether a daily use fee has been established by law and in addition to any other fee. All funds received from special events sponsored by the department shall be deposited in special events account. The funds deposited within the account are continuously appropriated to and may be expended by the department to conduct special events directly or pursuant to contracts entered under this subsection.

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 63, § 2.

There is created the LX Bar Ranch challenge account. The department of state parks and cultural resources may accept gifts from any individual or entity to maintain and improve the LX Bar Ranch and deposit those funds to the account. State funds deposited to the account are continuously appropriated to the department of state parks and cultural resources for purposes of maintaining and improving the LX Bar Ranch, but shall only be expended from the account upon a dollar for dollar matching distribution of nonstate funds or a matching contribution of in kind gifts. Funds in the account shall not lapse at the end of any fiscal period.

The department may establish methods whereby voluntary contributions may be accepted in support of state parks, historic sites, archeological sites or recreation areas. The department may suggest and solicit specific contribution amounts.

The department may, with the approval of the commission, charge an amenities fee in addition to any other fee authorized under this section for services designated by the commission as added amenities. Funds collected from the amenities fee authorized by this subsection shall be deposited in a separate account and are continuously appropriated to the department to pay the utility fees and maintenance costs for the additional amenities offered. The remaining funds collected from the amenities fee authorized by this subsection at the end of the fiscal year may be deposited in the state parks account and expended in accordance with subsection (h) of this section. Revenues and expenditures under this subsection for each of the immediately preceding two (2) fiscal years shall be reported within the department’s biennial budget request submitted under W.S.

9-2-1013

.

The department shall include as part of the opportunity to purchase a permit that allows use of state parks, recreation areas, archeological sites and historic sites the option for a permittee to donate an additional amount in support of wildlife conservation efforts related to the transportation system. Funds collected under this subsection shall be deposited into the wildlife conservation account created by W.S. 31-2-231(b).

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 259, § 86; W.S. 1957, § 36-44.21; Laws 1973, ch. 58, § 1; 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 1988, ch. 32, § 1; 1990, ch. 44, § 2; 1991, ch. 85, § 1; 1992, ch. 45, § 1; ch. 50, §§ 2, 3; 1993, ch. 200, § 1; 1994, ch. 58, § 1; ch. 80, § 1; Laws 1999, ch. 68, § 1; ch. 69, § 2; 2001, ch. 4, § 1; 2003, ch. 7, § 1; ch. 57, § 2; ch. 84, § 1; 2004, ch. 67, § 1; 2005, ch. 128, § 1; ch. 231, § 1; 2008, ch. 63, § 2; ch. 106, § 1; 2009, ch. 168, § 207, ch. 169, § 1; 2012, ch. 63, § 1; 2014 ch. 7, § 2, effective July 1, 2014; 2015 ch. 14, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 12, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2020 ch. 61, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 46, § 1, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, rewrote (h), which formerly directed that 80 percent of the funds be deposited in the capital construction account and 20 percent be deposited in the general fund.

The 2005 amendments. —

The first 2005 amendment, by ch. 128, § 1, in (h), substituted “department” for “division,” and inserted “major maintenance.”

Laws 2005, ch. 128, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 28, 2005.

The second 2005 amendment, by ch. 231, § 1, deleted “within the enterprise fund” in (h) and (o); and deleted “within the earmarked revenue fund” in (k).

See the conflicting legislation note. This section is set out incorporating the amendments by both 2005 acts.

The 2008 amendments.—

The first 2008 amendment, by ch. 63, § 2, effective March 7, 2008, repealed former (p), which read: “The Wyoming Veterans' Memorial Museum is exempt from the permit and fee requirements in this section.”

The second 2008 amendment, by ch. 106, § 1, effective January 1, 2009, in (a), revised dollar amounts, deleted “and sixty dollars ($60.00) per calendar year for an annual nonresident overnight camping permit” after “camping permit” in (ii), substituted “daily use” for “entrance” in (vii) and (ix), inserted present (xiv) and (xv) and redesignated former (xiv) to be (xvi).

The 2009 amendments. —

The first 2009 amendment, by Laws 2009, ch. 168, § 207, effective July 1, 2009, repealed (m), which read: “Notwithstanding subsection (h) of this section, fees collected at Keyhole state park by the department of state parks and cultural resources shall first be applied to expenses incurred by the department of state parks and cultural resources to implement and conduct the collection of such fees, and then shall be used to reimburse water development account I for the funds deposited in the Keyhole reservoir account established by W.S. 41-2-1001(a)(v) and funds expended to purchase water necessary to initially fill the recreation pool in Keyhole reservoir. Upon the repayment of the water development account, the fees shall be deposited in accordance with subsection (h) of this section. The game and fish department shall, from nonlicensure fees, reimburse water development account I in the amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) per year until the water development account I is repaid.”

The second 2009 amendment, by Laws 2009, ch. 169, § 1, deleted “bucking horse” preceding “daily use permit” throughout the section; deleted “bucking horse” preceding “annual permit” in the second sentence of (a)(v); substituted “annual daily use” for “annual bucking horse daily” in the third sentence of (a)(xiii); substituted “daily use permit” for “bucking horse entrance permit” in two places and deleted “or nonresident” following “annual resident” in the first sentence of (b); deleted “or nonresident” following “annual resident” in (c); in (e), in the first sentence substituted “annual daily use and annual camping permits” for “bucking horse permits” and in the last sentence deleted “annual bucking horse daily use permits and other” preceding “permits”; substituted “permit” for “bucking horse permit or the other permits” in (j); and
deleted “bucking horse” preceding permit in the first sentence in (n).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2012 amendment,

added (q).

Laws 2012, ch. 63 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 9, 2012.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, in (a)(xv), substituted “this paragraph for each of the immediately preceding two (2) fiscal years shall be reported within the department's biennial budget request submitted under W.S.

9-2-1013

” for “this paragraph shall be reported annually to the joint appropriations and joint travel, recreation, wildlife and cultural resources interim committees on June 30, of each year” in the second sentence.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a)(xv), substituted “the state parks” for “a capital construction” in the second sentence; in (h), substituted “into an account within the special revenue fund, hereby created as the state parks account” for “in a capital construction account” and made a related change, and added sentences two and three.

The 2017 amendments.—

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, rewrote the section.

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 12, § 2, effective July 1, 2017, deleted (a)(i) through (a)(xv).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (t).

The 2021 amendment

added the last sentence in (h).

Laws 2021, ch. 46, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2005, ch. 128, § 2, appropriates $7,000,000 from the general fund to the department of state parks and cultural resources, to fund road construction and major maintenance needs at outdoor recreation areas and facilities as defined in §

36-4-103

. The department is to prepare a five-year plan addressing capital needs, budget and need for general funds, if any, and is to submit its plan and a report to the joint appropriations and joint travel, recreation and wildlife interim committees by December 30, 2005.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 36-4-122.
Administration of Hot Springs state park.

Effective April 1, 1990, the authority for management, control and administration of the Hot Springs state park located at Thermopolis, Hot Springs county, is vested in the department of state parks and cultural resources, in consultation with the commission. Effective July 1, 1999, the authority for management, control and administration of the Hot Springs state park located at Thermopolis, Hot Springs county, is vested in the department of state parks and cultural resources, in consultation with the commission. The state park will be administered by the department in accordance with W.S.

36-8-301

through

36-8-405

.

and (c) Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 44, § 3.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 48, § 1; 1990, ch. 44, §§ 2, 3; 1999, ch. 69, § 2.

§ 36-4-123.
Selling agents for registrations, licenses and permits.

The department of state parks and cultural resources through the division of parks and historic sites shall appoint selling agents to sell snowmobile registrations pursuant to W.S.

31-2-402

, permits under W.S.

36-4-121

and other licenses, registrations and permits for which the department may by law be required to issue and collect fees. Selling agents appointed under this section shall be bonded by the department, subject to the following:

The appointed agent, prior to September 1 preceding the calendar year for which the bond is to be in effect, shall pay to the department a nonrefundable annual bonding fee of fifty dollars ($50.00);

Any newly appointed agent shall pay the bonding fee prescribed under paragraph (a)(i) of this section to the department immediately upon appointment for the remainder of the calendar year in which appointed;

Bonding fees collected under this subsection shall be deposited in a bond pool account, from which any claim against the bond of any selling agent and not directly collected from the agent shall be paid.

Each selling agent appointed under subsection (a) of this section shall:

On or before the tenth day of each month on forms provided by the division, file a report with the division stating all sales of registrations, licenses or permits by the agent during the preceding month;

Remit to the division all revenues collected by the agent from registration, license or permit sales during the preceding month reported under paragraph (b)(i) of this section, less any sales commission authorized by law;

Annually account for and deliver to the division all unused, surplus or damaged registration decals, licenses or permits received by the agent.

In addition to any other penalty imposed by law, any selling agent failing to comply with this section and other applicable law shall not receive any sales commission authorized by law.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 50, § 1; 1999, ch. 69, § 2; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2009, ch. 169, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “within the trust and agency fund” in (a)(iii).

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “bucking horse” following “31-2-402” in the introductory language of (a).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”